Mississippi, session 2026, HB1546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 99-19-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-19-71.  (1)  Any person who has been convicted of a misdemeanor that is not a traffic violation, and who is a first offender, may petition the justice, county, circuit or municipal court in which the conviction was had for an order to expunge any such conviction from all public records. (2)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person who has been convicted of a felony and who has paid all criminal fines and costs of court imposed in the sentence of conviction may petition the court in which the conviction was had for an order to expunge one (1) conviction from all public records five (5) years after the successful completion of all terms and conditions of the sentence for the conviction upon a hearing as determined in the discretion of the court; however, a person is not eligible to expunge a felony classified as: (i)  A crime of violence as provided in Section 97-3-2; (ii)  Arson, first degree as provided in Sections 97-17-1 and 97-17-3; (iii)  Trafficking in controlled substances as provided in Section 41-29-139; (iv)  A third, fourth or subsequent offense DUI as provided in Section 63-11-30(2)(c) and (2)(d); (v)  Felon in possession of a firearm as provided in Section 97-37-5; (vi)  Failure to register as a sex offender as provided in Section 45-33-33; (vii)  Voyeurism as provided in Section 97-29-61; (viii)  Witness intimidation as provided in Section 97-9-113; (ix)  Abuse, neglect or exploitation of a vulnerable person as provided in Section 43-47-19; * * *or (x)  Embezzlement as provided in Sections 97-11-25 and 97-23-19 * * *.; (xi)  Felony procuring prostitution as provided in Section 97-29-51; or (xii)  Promoting prostitution as provided in Section 97-29-51. A person is eligible for only one (1) felony expunction under this paragraph (a).  For the purposes of this section, the terms "one (1) conviction" and "one (1) felony expunction" mean and include all convictions that arose from a common nucleus of operative facts as determined in the discretion of the court. (b)  The petitioner shall give ten (10) days' written notice to the district attorney before any hearing on the petition.  In all cases, the court wherein the petition is filed may grant the petition if the court determines, on the record or in writing, that the applicant is rehabilitated from the offense which is the subject of the petition.  In those cases where the court denies the petition, the findings of the court in this respect shall be identified specifically and not generally. (3)  Upon entering an order of expunction under this section, a nonpublic record thereof shall be retained by the Mississippi Criminal Information Center solely for the purpose of determining whether, in subsequent proceedings, the person is a first offender.  The order of expunction shall not preclude a district attorney's office from retaining a nonpublic record thereof for law enforcement purposes only.  The existence of an order of expunction shall not preclude an employer from asking a prospective employee if the employee has had an order of expunction entered on his behalf.  The effect of the expunction order shall be to restore the person, in the contemplation of the law, to the status he occupied before any arrest or indictment for which convicted.  No person as to whom an expunction order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any provision of law to be guilty of perjury or to have otherwise given a false statement by reason of his failure to recite or acknowledge such arrest, indictment or conviction in response to any inquiry made of him for any purpose other than the purpose of determining, in any subsequent proceedings under this section, whether the person is a first offender.  A person as to whom an order has been entered, upon request, shall be required to advise the court, in camera, of the previous conviction and expunction in any legal proceeding wherein the person has been called as a prospective juror.  The court shall thereafter and before the selection of the jury advise the attorneys representing the parties of the previous conviction and expunction. (4)  Upon petition therefor, a justice, county, circuit or municipal court shall expunge the record of any case in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped or there was no disposition of such case, or the person was found not guilty at trial. (5)  No public official is eligible for expunction under this section for any conviction related to his official duties. SECTION 2.  Section 97-3-54.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-3-54.1.  (1)  (a) A person who coerces, recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides or obtains by any means, or attempts to coerce, recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide or obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that the person will be subjected to forced labor or services, or who benefits, whether financially or by receiving anything of value from participating in an enterprise that he knows or reasonably should have known has engaged in such acts, shall be guilty of the crime of human trafficking. (b)  A person who knowingly purchases the forced labor or services of a trafficked person or who otherwise knowingly subjects, or attempts to subject, another person to forced labor or services or who benefits, whether financially or by receiving anything of value from participating in an enterprise that he knows or reasonably should have known has engaged in such acts, shall be guilty of the crime of procuring involuntary servitude. (c)  A person who knowingly subjects, or attempts to subject, or who recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides or obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide or obtain by any means, a minor, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of sexually oriented material, or causes or attempts to cause a minor to engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of sexually oriented material, shall be guilty of procuring sexual servitude of a minor and shall be punished by commitment to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than twenty (20) years nor more than life in prison, or by a fine of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) nor more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00), or both.  It is not a defense in a prosecution under this section that a minor consented to engage in the commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of sexually oriented material, or that the defendant reasonably believed that the minor was eighteen (18) years of age or older. (2)  If the victim is not a minor, a person who is convicted of an offense set forth in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than two (2) years nor more than twenty (20) years, or by a fine of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or both.  If the victim of the offense is a minor, a person who is convicted of an offense set forth in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than twenty (20) years nor more than life in prison, or by a fine of not less than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) nor more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or both. (3)  An enterprise may be prosecuted for an offense under this chapter if: (a)  An agent of the enterprise knowingly engages in conduct that constitutes an offense under this chapter while acting within the scope of employment and for the benefit of the entity. (b)  An employee of the enterprise engages in conduct that constitutes an offense under this chapter and the commission of the offense was part of a pattern of illegal activity for the benefit of the enterprise, which an agent of the enterprise either knew was occurring or recklessly disregarded, and the agent failed to take effective action to stop the illegal activity. (c)  It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution of an enterprise that the enterprise had in place adequate procedures, including an effective complaint procedure, designed to prevent persons associated with the enterprise from engaging in the unlawful conduct and to promptly correct any violations of this chapter. (d)  The court may consider the severity of the enterprise's offense and order penalties, including:  (i) a fine of not more than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00); (ii) disgorgement of profit; and (iii) debarment from government contracts. Additionally, the court may order any of the relief provided in Section 97-3-54.7. (4)  In addition to the mandatory reporting provisions contained in Sections 43-21-353 and 97-5-51, any person who has reasonable cause to suspect that a minor under the age of eighteen (18) is a trafficked person shall immediately make a report of the suspected child abuse or neglect to the Department of Child Protection Services and to the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator.  The Department of Child Protection Services or the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator, whichever is applicable, shall then immediately notify the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the suspected child abuse, neglect or trafficking occurred as required in Section 43-21-353, and the department that received the report shall also commence an initial investigation into the suspected abuse or neglect as required in Section 43-21-353.  The department that received such report shall provide an annual report to the Speaker of the Mississippi House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor, the Chairpersons of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees that includes the number of reports received, the number of cases screened in or out, the number of cases in which care and services were provided as a result of the report, and the type of care and services that were provided.  A minor who has been identified as a victim of trafficking shall not be liable for criminal activity in violation of this section, a misdemeanor, or a felony offense not classified as a crime of violence under Section 97-3-2 if the offense: (a)  Occurred during the time period in which the victim was being trafficked; and (b)  Occurred as a direct result of the victim's trafficking. (5)  It is an affirmative defense in a prosecution under this act that the defendant: (a)  Is a victim; and (b)  Committed the offense under a reasonable apprehension created by a person that, if the defendant did not commit the act, the person would inflict serious harm on the defendant, a member of the defendant's family, or a close associate. SECTION 3.  Section 97-3-54.6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-3-54.6.  Injunctive and other relief for victims of trafficking; confidentiality.  (1)  Any circuit court may, after making due provision for the rights of trafficked persons, enjoin violations of the provisions of this act by issuing appropriate orders and judgments, including, but not limited to: (a)  Ordering any defendant to divest himself of any interest in any enterprise, including real property. (b)  Imposing reasonable restrictions upon the future activities or investments of any defendant, including, but not limited to, prohibiting any defendant from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise in which he was engaged in violation of the provisions of this act. (c)  Ordering the dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise. (d)  Ordering the suspension or revocation of a license or permit granted to any enterprise by any agency of the state. (e)  Ordering the forfeiture of the charter of a corporation organized under the laws of the state, or the revocation of a certificate authorizing a foreign corporation to conduct business within the state, upon finding that the board of directors or a managerial agent acting on behalf of the corporation in conducting the affairs of the corporation, has authorized or engaged in conduct in violation of this chapter and that, for the prevention of future criminal activity, the public interest requires the charter of the corporation forfeited and the corporation dissolved or the certificate revoked. (2)  Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Section 99-37-1 et seq., the court shall order restitution to the victim for any offense under this chapter.  The order of restitution under this section shall direct the defendant to pay the victim, through the appropriate court mechanism, the full amount of the victim's pecuniary damages.  For the purposes of determining restitution, the term "victim" means the individual harmed as a result of a crime under this chapter, including, in the case of a victim who is under eighteen (18) years of age, incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, the legal guardian of the victim or a representative of the victim's estate, or another family member, or any other person appointed as suitable by the court, but in no event shall the defendant be named as such a representative or guardian.  The court may order restitution even if the victim is absent from the jurisdiction or unavailable. (3)  Any person who is injured by reason of any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall have a cause of action against any person or enterprise convicted of engaging in activity in violation of this chapter for threefold the actual damages sustained and, when appropriate, punitive damages.  The person shall also recover attorney's fees in the trial and appellate courts and reasonable costs of investigation and litigation. (4)  The application of one (1) civil remedy under any provision of this act shall not preclude the application of any other remedy, civil or criminal, under this act or any other provision of law.  Civil remedies under this act are supplemental. (5)  At any time after a conviction or adjudication of delinquency under this act, the court in which the conviction or adjudication of delinquency was entered may, upon appropriate motion, vacate the conviction or adjudication of delinquency if the court finds the defendant's participation in the offense was the result of being a victim.  Official documentation from a federal, state or local government agency as to the defendant's status as a victim at the time of the offense creates a presumption that the defendant's participation in the offense was a result of being a victim, but official documentation is not required to grant a motion under this subsection. (6)  At any time after a conviction or adjudication of delinquency of a misdemeanor or a felony offense not classified as a crime of violence under Section 97-3-2, the court in which the conviction or adjudication of delinquency was entered may, upon appropriate motion, expunge the conviction or adjudication of delinquency if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant's participation in the offense occurred during the time period in which the victim was being trafficked and was the direct result of being a victim. Official documentation from a federal, state or local government agency as to the defendant's status as a victim at the time of the offense creates a presumption that the defendant's participation in the offense was a result of being a victim, but official documentation is not required to grant a motion under this subsection. (7)  The clerk of the court shall not charge a filing fee, service charge, or copy fee or any other charge for a petition filed under subsections (5) or (6). (8)  (a)  Notwithstanding Section 97-3-54.1(5), it is an affirmative defense to a prosecution for any misdemeanor and felony offense that is not classified as a crime of violence in Section 97-3-2, and if at the time a person engaged in the conduct charged to constitute the offense, the person: (i)  Was a trafficked person as defined in Section 97-3-54.4(q); and (ii)  Engaged in the offense as a direct result of his or her status as a victim. (b)  Neither the failure to raise this affirmative defense nor the court's finding on the affirmative defense shall have any effect on the petitioner's ability to file for an expungement under subsection (6). ( * * *69)  In a prosecution or civil action for damages for an offense under this act in which there is evidence that the alleged victim was subjected to sexual servitude, reputation or opinion evidence of past sexual behavior of the alleged victim is not admissible, unless admitted in accordance with the Mississippi Rules of Evidence. ( * * *710)  In any investigation or prosecution for an offense under this act, the responsible law enforcement agency or prosecutor's office are required to take all reasonable efforts to keep the identity of the victim and the victim's family confidential by ensuring that the names and identifying information of those individuals are not disclosed to the public. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.